ko: 맛 특성: 아로마틱; 밸런스; 달콤한 맛; 새콤달콤한 맛; 새콤한 맛; 기타
sv: Smakprofil: Aromatisk; Balanserad; Söt; Sötsyrlig; Syrlig; Annat
de: Geschmacksprofil: Aromatisch; Ausgewogen; Süß; Süß-säuerlich; Säuerlich; Sonstige
fi: Makuprofiili: Aromaattinen; Tasapainoinen; Makea; Makeanhapan; Hapan; Muu
ru: Вкусовой профиль: Ароматный; Сбалансированный; Сладкий; Кисло-сладкий; Терпкий; Другое
zh-TW: 味道特徵: 芳香; 平衡; 甜味; 酸甜; 酸味; 其他
en: Taste profile: Aromatic; Balanced; Sweet; Sweet-tart; Tart; Other
vi: Hồ sơ hương vị: Thơm; Cân bằng; Ngọt; Chua ngọt; Chua; Khác
nb: Smaksprofil: Aromatisk; Balansert; Søt; Søtlig/syrlig; Syrlig; Annet
sk-SK: Profil chuti: Aromatický; Vyvážený; Sladký; Sladkokyslý; Kyslastý; Iné
da: Smagsprofil: Aromatisk; Balanceret; Sød; Sød/syrlig; Syrlig; Andet
it: Profilo gustativo: Aromatico; Equilibrato; Dolce; Dolce-aspro; Aspro; Altro
bg-BG: Вкусов профил: Ароматен; Балансиран; Сладък; Сладко-тръпчив; Тръпчив; Друго
lt-LT: Skonio profilis: Aromatingas; Subalansuotas; Saldus; Saldžiarūgštis; Rūgštus; Kita
pl: Profil smakowy: Aromatyczny; Zrównoważony; Słodki; Słodko-cierpki; Cierpki; Inny
ja: 風味特性: アロマティック; バランス; 甘口; 甘酸っぱい; 酸味; その他
el: Γευστικά χαρακτηριστικά: Αρωματικό; Ισορροπημένο; Γλυκό; Γλυκόξινο; Ξινό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Perfil de sabor: Aromático; Equilibrado; Doce; Agridoce; Azedo; Outro
fr: Profil gustatif: Aromatique; Équilibré; Sucré; Aigre-doux; Acidulé; Autre
pt-PT: Perfil de sabor: Aromático; Equilibrado; Doce; Agridoce; Azedo; Outro
sl-SI: Profil okusa: Aromatično; Uravnoteženo; Sladko; Sladko-kiselkasto; Kiselkasto; Drugo
ro-RO: Profil gustativ: Aromat; Echilibrat; Dulce; Dulce-acrișor; Acrișor; Altele
hr-HR: Profil ukusa: Aromatično; Uravnoteženo; Slatko; Slatko-kiselkasto; Kiselkasto; Ostalo
cs: Profil chuti: Aromatický; Vyvážený; Sladký; Sladkokyselý; Kyselý; Jiné
nl: Smaakprofiel: Aromatisch; Gebalanceerd; Zoet; Zoetzuur; Zuur; Overig
th: ลักษณะ Taste: มีกลิ่นหอม; กลมกล่อม; หวาน; หวานอมเปรี้ยว; เปรี้ยว; อื่นๆ
es: Perfil de sabor: Aromático; Equilibrado; Dulce; Agridulce; Ácido; Otro
zh-CN: 风味特征: 芳香型; 均衡型; 甜味型; 酸甜型; 酸味型; 其他
tr: Tat profili: Aromatik; Dengeli; Tatlı; Tatlı-ekşi; Ekşi; Diğer
hu: Taste: Aromás; Kiegyensúlyozott; Édes; Édeskés-fanyar; Fanyar; Egyéb